Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.620

Judicial review of denial of reinstatement.

(1) If the secretary of state denies a domestic entity's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the secretary of state shall serve the entity with a notice in a record that explains the reasons for denial.

(2) An entity may seek judicial review of denial of reinstatement in the superior court not later than thirty days after service of the notice of denial.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1605.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.